Idaho, session 2025, H0005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 5, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 5-349, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
5-349. IMMUNITY OF BEHAVIORAL THREAT ASSESSMENT AND MANAGEMENT TEAMS
IN SCHOOLS. (1) It is the policy of this state to strive to prevent targeted
violence in public schools through the use of behavioral threat assessment
and management teams in school districts and public charter schools. The
legislature finds that the likelihood of an act of targeted violence occur-
ring can be reduced when behaviors that suggest violence as a possible out-
come are identified and addressed.
(2) The following definitions shall apply to this section:
(a) "Behavioral threat assessment and management" or "BTAM" means a
process to identify students whose behavior elicits concern, assess
students' risk of engaging in targeted violence or other harmful activ-
ities at school, and implement intervention strategies to manage that
risk.
(b) "Behavioral threat assessment and management team" or "BTAM team"
means a multidisciplinary team of school or school district or public
charter school personnel, which may include faculty, staff, and admin-
istrators and may also include available nurses, counselors, and school
resource officers, who will direct, manage, and document the threat
assessment process. The team may also include, where available and as
needed, representatives from a local child advocacy center, represen-
tatives from a juvenile assessment center, mental health specialists
from the department of health and welfare who are trained in children's
mental health, juvenile probation officers, and other community mem-
bers whose experience or expertise may assist in the threat assessment
process, following the protocols and leadership of the local school
district or public charter school.
(c) "BTAM model guidelines" means guidelines provided by the Idaho
school safety and security program on how to establish behavioral
threat assessment and management teams, develop trusted reporting mea-
sures, and conduct threat assessments.
(d) "Imminent risk" means a BTAM team's assessment, as a result of its
behavioral threat assessment, that a person appears to have at present
both the desire and capability to conduct an act of targeted violence


and that such person poses an immediate risk of targeted violence that
requires imminent containment and action to prevent violence from oc-
curring.
(e) "Targeted violence" means violence that is premeditated and di-
rected at specific individuals, groups, or locations, as distinct from
violence that is impulsive, random, or spontaneous.
(3) The Idaho school safety and security program shall make BTAM model
guidelines and ongoing training available to public school districts and
public charter schools.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
no BTAM team that is organized consistent with the provisions of this
section, nor any individual participant therein, shall be liable, nor
shall a cause of action exist against a public school district or public
charter school, for damages or injuries arising from a failure of the
BTAM team of a school district or public charter school to prevent an act
of targeted violence, provided that the BTAM team:
(i) Acted in good faith in attempting to follow a model in sub-
stantial conformance to the BTAM model guidelines and, prior to
the act of targeted violence, either:
1. Responded in a manner consistent with the BTAM model
guidelines to manage the imminent risk at school or at any
school-sponsored activity posed by the person who engaged in
such act; or
2. Determined in good faith, consistent with the BTAM model
guidelines, that the person who engaged in such act did not
present an imminent risk of targeted violence at school or at
any school-sponsored activity; and
(ii) Conducted its threat assessment, if any, without violating
any state or federal laws regarding:
1. The right to keep and bear arms;
2. Confidentiality and student privacy; and
3. Parental rights.
(b) The findings referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
be determined by the court as a matter of law.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to exclude,
limit, or otherwise affect the application of any other immunity provisions
under Idaho law, including but not limited to the Idaho tort claims act,
chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.